Massachusetts, session 194th, H987.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after section
21, the following section:-
Section 21A. The department shall update state waste system plans to reflect and
incorporate the following: the transition to a circular economy is a priority for the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts. Circular economy is defined as an economy that keeps
material, products, and services in circulation for as long as possible.
SECTION 2. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after section
67, the following section:-
Section 68. The Massachusetts Department of Environmental Protection shall create a
circular economy education and outreach program. This education and outreach program shall:
inform the public about what the circular economy is; inform the public on how they can
participate in the transition to a circular economy; inform Massachusetts businesses on what the
of 2

circular economy is; inform Massachusetts businesses on how to participate in the transition to a
circular economy.
of 2